Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are  appropriated to the State Department of Geology and Mineral
Industries, for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the following
amounts, for the following purposes:
(1) Geologic survey......................... $ 8,862,685
(2) Mined land reclamation ............ $ 1,825,000
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts and fed-
eral funds for contract services, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds not described
in this section, collected or received  by the State Department of Geology and Mineral In-
dustries, for the following purposes:
(1) Geologic survey......................... $ 12,745,157
(2) Mined land reclamation ............ $ 7,324,101
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$5,988,729 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds other  than those described in section 2 of this 2025
Act, collected or received by the State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Enrolled House Bill 5010 (HB 5010-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5010 (HB 5010-A) Page 2